Illinois, session 104th, SB3027.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fair Patient Billing Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 and by adding Section 11 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 88/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning given to that 9term in Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 10    "Collection action" means any referral of a bill to a 11collection agency or law firm to collect payment for services 12from a patient or a patient's guarantor for hospital services.13    "Health care plan" means a health insurance company, 14health maintenance organization, preferred provider 15arrangement, or third party administrator authorized in this 16State to issue policies or subscriber contracts or administer 17those policies and contracts that reimburse for inpatient and 18outpatient services provided in a hospital. Health care plan, 19however, does not include any government-funded program such 20as Medicare or Medicaid, workers' compensation, and accident 21liability insurers.22    "Insured patient" means a patient who is insured by a 23health care plan.  SB3027- 2 -LRB104 19566 BAB 33014 b1    "Medical debt" means a debt arising from the receipt of 2health care services, products, or devices. 3    "Patient" means the individual receiving services from the 4hospital and any individual who is the guarantor of the 5payment for such services. 6    "Public health insurance program" means Medicare; 7Medicaid; medical assistance under the Non-Citizen Victims of 8Trafficking, Torture and Other Serious Crimes program; Health 9Benefit for Immigrant Adults; Health Benefit for Immigrant 10Seniors; All Kids; or other medical assistance programs 11offered by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services. 12    "Reasonable payment plan" means a plan to pay a hospital 13bill that is offered to the patient or the patient's legal 14representative and takes into account the patient's available 15income and assets, the amount owed, and any prior payments.16    "Screen" or "screening" means a process whereby a hospital 17engages with a patient to review and assess the patient's 18potential eligibility for any financial assistance offered by 19the hospital, public health insurance program, or other 20discounted care known to the hospital; informs the patient of 21the hospital's assessment; documents in the patient's record 22the circumstances of the screening; and assists with the 23application for hospital financial assistance. 24    "Uninsured patient" means a patient who is not insured by 25a health care plan and is not a beneficiary under a 26government-funded program, workers' compensation, or accident   SB3027- 3 -LRB104 19566 BAB 33014 b1liability insurance. 2(Source: P.A. 103-323, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (210 ILCS 88/11 new)4    Sec. 11. Prohibition on the use of artificial intelligence 5in patient billing. All hospitals are prohibited from using 6artificial intelligence to set or influence health care 7pricing or billing.